Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1703
Rules and regulations; internal references; how construed.

Any reference to a Chapter 79 section number contained in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated prior to July 19, 1996, shall be deemed to refer to the section in Laws 1996, LB 900, containing the referenced provisions without requiring any revision of the rules or regulations, regardless of the section number assigned to such section as part of the codification process.

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1013.